ling073-abe-master/apertium-abe.abe.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O Ô P R S T U W Y Z Ȣ
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o ô p r s t u w y z ȣ ʻ
 %>:0
 %{A%}:a %{A%}:0 %{A%}:i %{A%}:o
 %{a%}:a %{a%}:0
 %{w%}:w %{w%}:0
 %{W%}:w %{W%}:o
 %{I%}:e %{I%}:o %{I%}:0
 %{D%}:d %{D%}:j
 %{d%}:d %{d%}:0
 %{k%}:k %{k%}:0
 %{ȣ%}:ȣ %{ȣ%}:0
 %{Ȣ%}:ȣ %{Ȣ%}:a %{Ȣ%}:0
 %{SG%}:0
 %{PL%}:0
 %{LOC%}:0
 %{ʻ%}:ʻ %{ʻ%}:0
;
Sets

Vowel = A E I O Ô Ȣ U Y
        a e i o ô ȣ u y ;

Plosive = P T K B D G 
          p t k b d g ;

Rules
"{D} realizes as j root finally in an animate plural"
%{D%}:j <=> _ %>: %{PL%}: %{A%}: k ;

"{A} realizes as i after j and g"
%{A%}:i <=> [ :j | g: ] %>: %{PL%}: _ ;

"{w} realizes as nothing root finally in the plural and locative"
%{w%}:0 <=> _ %>: [ %{PL%}: | %{LOC%}: ] ;

"{A} realizes as o after gw and kw"
%{A%}:o <=> %{w%}: %>: %{PL%}: _ ;

"{A} realizes as nothing following ȣ and a in the animate plural"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ ȣ | a ] %>: %{PL%}: _ k ;

"{A} realizes as nothing following ȣ"
%{A%}:0 <=> :ȣ _ ;

"{A} realizes as nothing following ȣ in the inanimate plural"
%{A%}:0 <=> ȣ %>: %{PL%}: _ l ;

"{w} never surfaces word finally after nasals"
%{w%}:0 <=> [ n | m ] _ ;

"{I} realizes as nothing after a root final vowel in the locative"
%{I%}:0 <=> :Vowel %>: %{LOC%}: _ ;

"{w} realizes as nothing word finally in the locative"
%{w%}:0 <=> %{LOC%}: %{I%}: k _ .#. ;

"{W} realizes as w word finally"
%{W%}:w <=> _ .#. ;

"{I} realizes as o after an underlying w in the locative"
%{I%}:o <=> %{w%}: %>: %{LOC%}: _ ;

"{d} surfaces before i, a, o, ȣ, and {w}"
%{d%}:d <=> _ %>: [ i | a | o | ȣ | %{w%} ] ;

"{ȣ} realizes as nothing before a vowel"
%{ȣ%}:0 <=> _ :Vowel ;

"{ʻ} realizes as nothing before a plosive"
 %{ʻ%}:0 <=> _ :Plosive ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
